Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.370

Comprehensive plan—Filing of copies.

Whenever a planning agency has developed a comprehensive plan, or any addition or amendment thereto, covering any land outside of the boundaries of the county as provided in RCW 36.70.320, copies of any features of the comprehensive plan extending into an adjoining jurisdiction shall for purposes of information be filed with such adjoining jurisdiction.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.370. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 37.]